Washington statutes.
RCW 15.08.230

Disinfection of public properties.

The director may require the governing body of counties, cities, towns and irrigation and school districts or other political subdivisions of the state to disinfect or destroy all infected trees, shrubs, or other nursery stock growing upon public property within their respective jurisdictions, or the director may disinfect or destroy such infected trees, shrubs, or other nursery stock.

[ 1981 c 296 s 6; 1961 c 11 s 15.08.230. Prior: 1915 c 166 s 19; RRS s 2857.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 296: See note following RCW 15.08.010.